Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 15 Passing, Use of Lanes, and Rules of the Road

31-15-1.
Right half of road.

Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:

When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing the movement;

When the right half of a roadway is closed to traffic while under construction or repair;

Upon a roadway divided into three (3) marked lanes for traffic under the rules applicable to it; or

Upon a roadway designated and signposted for one-way traffic.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-1

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-2.
Slow traffic to right.

Upon all roadways any vehicle proceeding at less than the normal speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing shall be driven in the right-hand lane then available for traffic, or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway, except when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-2

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-3.
Passing of vehicles proceeding in opposite directions.

Drivers of vehicles proceeding in opposite directions shall pass each other to the right, and upon roadways having a width for not more than one line of traffic in each direction, each driver shall give to the other at least one-half of the main traveled portion of the roadway as nearly as possible. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-3

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-4.
Overtaking on left.

The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those limitations, exceptions, and special rules stated in this chapter:

The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle proceeding in the same direction shall give a timely, audible signal and shall pass to the left at a safe distance and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken vehicle.

Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted, the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase the speed of his or her vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-4

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-5.
Overtaking on the right.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass upon the right of another vehicle only under the following conditions:

When the vehicle overtaken is making or about to make a left turn;

Upon a one-way street, or upon any roadway on which traffic is restricted to one direction of movement, where the roadway is free from obstructions and of sufficient width for two (2) or more lines of moving vehicles. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass another vehicle upon the right only under conditions permitting the movement in safety. In no event shall the movement be made by driving off the pavement or main-traveled portion of the roadway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-5

; P.L. 1970, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-6.
Clearance for overtaking.

No vehicle shall be driven to the left side of the center of the roadway in overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, unless the left side is clearly visible and is free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to permit the overtaking and passing to be completely made without interfering with the safe operation of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle overtaken. In every event the overtaking vehicle must return to the right-hand side of the roadway before coming within one hundred feet (100´) of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-6

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-7.
Places where overtaking prohibited.

No vehicle shall at any time be driven to the left side of the roadway under the following conditions:

When approaching the crest of a grade or upon a curve in the highway where the driver’s view is obstructed within such distance as to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach from the opposite direction;

When approaching within one hundred feet (100´) of or traversing any intersection or railroad grade crossing;

When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred feet (100´) of any bridge, viaduct, or tunnel.

The limitations in subsection (a) of this section shall not apply upon a one-way roadway.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-7

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-8.
Posting of no passing zones.

The state traffic commission is authorized to determine those portions of any highway where overtaking and passing or driving to the left of the roadway would be especially hazardous and may by appropriate signs or markings on the roadway indicate the beginning and end of the zones. When the signs or markings are in place and clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person every driver of a vehicle shall obey the directions given by them. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-8

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-9.
One way highways.

The state traffic commission may designate any highway or any separate roadway under its jurisdiction for one-way traffic and shall erect appropriate signs giving notice of one-way traffic.

Upon a roadway designated and signposted for one-way traffic a vehicle shall be driven only in the direction designated.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-9

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-10.
Rotary traffic islands.

A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island shall be driven only to the right of the island. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-10

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-11.
Laned roadways.

Whenever any roadway has been divided into two (2) or more clearly marked lanes for traffic, the following rules in addition to all others consistent with them shall apply:

A vehicle shall be driven as nearly as practical entirely within a single lane and shall not be moved from the lane until the driver has first ascertained that the movement can be made with safety.

Upon a roadway which is divided into three (3) lanes, a vehicle shall not be driven in the center lane except when overtaking and passing another vehicle where the roadway is clearly visible and the center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance, or in preparation for a left turn or where the center lane is at the time allocated exclusively to traffic moving in the direction the vehicle is proceeding and is sign-posted to give notice of the allocation.

Official signs may be erected directing slow-moving traffic to use a designated lane or designating those lanes to be used by traffic moving in a particular direction regardless of the center of the roadway, and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of the sign.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-11

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-12.
Interval between vehicles.

The driver of a motor vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of the vehicles and the traffic upon and the condition of the highway, and shall, whenever traveling through a business or residential district, and whenever traffic permits, leave sufficient space so that an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy the space without danger. This provision shall not apply to a caravan under police escort or a funeral procession. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-12

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-12.1.
Entering intersections.

The driver of a motor vehicle shall not enter an intersection whether or not any traffic signal is green unless there is sufficient space in the roadway he or she is about to enter beyond the intersection to receive his or her vehicle without blocking the intersection. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in section

31-41.1-4

, unless bodily injury, serious bodily injury or death occurs to any person other than the offending operator under this section.

When bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200). When serious bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months. When the death of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of one year.

As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 4; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110; P.L. 2013, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 414, § 1.

31-15-12.2.
Don’t Block the Box.

No operator of a motor vehicle shall proceed into an intersection that has been designated, posted, and marked by a municipality in accordance with subsection (b), except when making a turn, unless there is sufficient space on the opposite side of the intersection to accommodate such motor vehicle without obstructing the passage of other vehicles or pedestrians, notwithstanding the indication of a traffic control signal that would permit such operator to proceed into the intersection.

Any municipality may, by ordinance, designate one or more intersections within that municipality as “Don’t Block the Box” intersections, to which the provisions of subsection (a) shall apply. The municipality shall:

Post “Don’t Block the Box” signs, as designed by the state traffic commission so as to have conformity in all municipalities, at each such designated intersection indicating that blocking the intersection is prohibited and violators are subject to a fine; and

Mark, in white paint, the boundary of such intersection with a line not less than one-foot in width and the area within such boundary line with parallel diagonal lines not less than one-foot in width.

Prior to January 1, 2017, any motorist who violates this subsection shall be issued a verbal warning only; this verbal warning shall only apply to “Don’t Block the Box” intersections as established by subsection (b).

Effective January 1, 2017, any motorist who commits a first violation of this section shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100); a second violation of this section shall be fined two hundred fifty dollars ($250); and for a third and subsequent violation of this section, five hundred dollars ($500).

Any city or town that determines that it has a traffic and safety problem in its community due to violations of this section on state intersections located within its municipality may petition the state traffic commission, created by §

31-13-1

, for permission to paint “Don’t Block the Box” lines in accordance with subsection (b).

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 539, § 1.

31-15-13.
Divided highways.

Whenever any highway has been divided into two (2) roadways by leaving an unpaved intervening space or by a physical barrier, every vehicle shall be driven only upon the right-hand roadway and no vehicle shall be driven over, across, or within a dividing space, barrier, or section, except through an opening in the physical barrier or dividing section or space or at a crossover or intersection established by public authority. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-13

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110; P.L. 2013, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 89, § 1.

31-15-14.
Entry or leaving of limited-access roadways.

No person shall drive a vehicle onto or from any limited-access roadway except at those entrances and exits that are established by public authority. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-14

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-15.
Designation and posting of controlled-access roadways.

The state traffic commission may, by resolution or order entered in its minutes, and local authorities may by ordinance with respect to any controlled-access roadway under their respective jurisdictions, prohibit the use of a roadway by pedestrians, bicycles, or other non-motorized traffic or by any person operating a motordriven cycle.

The state traffic commission or the local authority adopting the prohibitory regulations shall erect and maintain official signs on the controlled access roadway on which the regulations are applicable and when so erected no person shall disobey the restrictions stated on the signs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 26, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

31-15-15

.

31-15-16.
Use of emergency break-down lane for travel.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle for travel on the emergency break-down lane of any highway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 110.

31-15-17.
Crossing bicycle lane.

A person may not operate a motor vehicle upon a bicycle lane except when making a turn, entering or leaving the roadway or a parking lane, or when required in the course of official duty. An implement of husbandry may momentarily cross into a bicycle lane to permit other vehicles to overtake and pass the implement of husbandry.

Violations of this section are subject of fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 2.

31-15-18.
Unsafe passing of a person operating a bicycle; penalty.

A driver of a motor vehicle commits the offense of unsafe passing of a person operating a bicycle if the driver violates any of the following requirements:

The driver of a motor vehicle may only pass a person operating a bicycle by driving to the left of the bicycle at a safe distance and returning to the lane of travel once the motor vehicle is safely clear of the overtaken bicycle. For the purposes of this subdivision, a “safe distance” means a distance that is sufficient to prevent contact with the person operating the bicycle if the person were to fall into the driver’s lane of traffic. This subdivision does not apply to a driver operating a motor vehicle:

In a lane that is separate from and adjacent to a designated bicycle lane;

At a speed not greater than fifteen miles per hour (15 mph); or

When the driver is passing a person operating a bicycle on the person’s right side and the person operating the bicycle is turning left.

The driver of a motor vehicle may drive to the left of the center of a roadway to pass a person operating a bicycle proceeding in the same direction only if the roadway to the left of the center is unobstructed for a sufficient distance to permit the driver to pass the person operating the bicycle safely and avoid interference with oncoming traffic. This subdivision does not authorize driving to the left of center of a roadway when prohibited under § 31-15-1 (failure to drive on right), § 31-15-3 (passing of vehicles proceeding in opposite directions) or § 31-15-13 (divided highway).

The driver of a motor vehicle that passes a person operating a bicycle shall return to an authorized lane of traffic as soon as practicable.

Violations of this section are subject to the fine enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

This section may be cited as “Frank’s Law.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 132, § 1.

31-15-19.
Two-way left turn lanes.

A two-way left turn lane may be designated near the center of a roadway for use by vehicles making left turns in both directions from or into the roadway.

Two-way left turn lanes shall be designated by distinctive roadway markings consisting of parallel double yellow lines, interior line dashed and exterior line solid on each side of the lane. The department of transportation may determine and prescribe standards and specifications governing length, width, and positioning of the distinctive pavement markings. All pavement markings designating a two-way left turn lane shall conform to the department of transportation’s standards and specifications.

A vehicle shall not be driven in a designated two-way left turn lane except when preparing for or making a left turn from or into a highway or when preparing for or making a U-turn when otherwise permitted by law, and shall not be driven in that lane for more than two hundred feet (200´) while preparing for and making the turn or while preparing to merge into the adjacent lanes of travel. A left turn or U-turn shall not be made from any other lane where a two-way left turn lane has been designated.

This section shall not prohibit driving across a two-way left turn lane.

Raised pavement markers may be used to simulate painted lines described in this section when such markers are placed in accordance with standards established by the department of transportation.

Upon any vehicle entering the turn lane, no other vehicle proceeding in the opposite direction shall enter that turn lane if that entrance would prohibit the vehicle already in the lane from making the intended turn.

When vehicles enter the turn lane proceeding in opposite directions, the first vehicle to enter the lane shall have the right-of-way.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 325, § 1.

31-15-20.
Unsafe passing of a vulnerable road user.

For purposes of this section, “vulnerable road user” means:

A pedestrian who is acting in compliance with chapter 18 of this title;

A bicyclist who is acting in compliance with chapter 19 of this title;

A police officer or emergency worker on duty when outside of a vehicle;

A highway worker performing duties outside of a vehicle;

A person riding on or driving a wheelchair, motorized or not, who is acting in compliance with chapter 18 of this title;

A person using a skateboard, inline skates, or roller skates who is acting in compliance with chapter 19 of this title;

A person riding on or driving an animal;

A person riding on a scooter who is acting in compliance with chapter 19.1 of this title.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, any person, while operating a motor vehicle on a street or highway, who fails to exercise due care to avoid colliding with a vulnerable road user, who is the proximate cause of injury, serious injury, or death to the vulnerable road user, shall be guilty of an offense pursuant to this section and shall be sentenced, in addition to any other applicable criminal or civil statute, as follows:

When bodily injury of a vulnerable road user is caused by a violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200).

When serious bodily injury of a vulnerable road user is caused by a violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500), and the driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months.

When the death of a vulnerable road user is caused by a violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and the driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of one year.

As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 25, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 66, § 1, effective June 25, 2021.